Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Article III. Commission Established

§ 1804.
Commission established.

There is hereby created a Commission to administer the compact, composed of delegations from each state in the region. Each delegation shall include at least one dairy farmer who is engaged in the production of milk at the time of appointment or reappointment, and one consumer representative. Delegation members shall be residents and voters of, and subject to such confirmation process as is provided for in, the appointing state. Delegation members shall serve no more than three consecutive terms with no single term of more than four years, and be subject to removal for cause. In all other respects, members shall serve in accordance with the laws of the state represented. The compensation, if any, of the members of a state delegation shall be determined and paid by each state, but their expenses shall be paid by the Commission. Each state delegation shall be entitled to one vote in the conduct of the Commission’s affairs.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1805.
Voting requirements.

All actions taken by the Commission, except for the establishment or termination of an over-order price or commission marketing order, and the adoption, amendment, or rescission of the Commission’s bylaws, shall be by majority vote of the delegations present. Establishment or termination of an over-order price or commission marketing order shall require at least two-thirds vote of the delegations present. The establishment of a regulated area which covers all or part of a participating state shall require also the affirmative vote of that state’s delegation. A majority of the delegations from the participating states shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of the Commission’s business.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1806.
Administration and management.

The Commission shall elect annually from among the members of the participating state delegations a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and a treasurer. The Commission shall appoint an executive director and fix his or her duties and compensation. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the Commission, and, together with the treasurer, shall be bonded in an amount determined by the Commission. The Commission may establish through its bylaws an executive committee composed of one member elected by each delegation.

The Commission shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business by a two-thirds vote, and shall have the power by the same vote to amend and rescind these bylaws. The Commission shall publish its bylaws in convenient form with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the participating states. The bylaws shall provide for appropriate notice to the delegations of all commission meetings and hearings and of the business to be transacted at such meetings or hearings. Notice also shall be given to other agencies or officers of participating states as provided by the laws of those states.

The Commission shall file an annual report with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, and with each of the participating states by submitting copies to the governor, both houses of the legislature, and the head of the state department having responsibilities for agriculture.

In addition to the powers and duties elsewhere prescribed in this compact, the Commission shall have the power:

to sue and be sued in any state or federal court;

to have a seal and alter the same at pleasure;

to acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property by gift, purchase, lease, license, or other similar manner, for its corporate purposes;

to borrow money and to issue notes, to provide for the rights of the holders thereof, and to pledge the revenue of the Commission as security therefor, subject to the provisions of section 1818 of this compact;

to appoint such officers, agents, and employees as it may deem necessary, prescribe their powers, duties, and qualifications; and

to create and abolish such offices, employments, and positions as it deems necessary for the purposes of the compact and provide for the removal, term, tenure, compensation, fringe benefits, pension, and retirement rights of its officers and employees. The Commission may also retain personal services on a contract basis.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1807.
Rulemaking power.

In addition to the power to promulgate a compact over-order price or commission marketing orders as provided by this compact, the Commission is further empowered to make and enforce such additional rules and regulations as it deems necessary to implement any provisions of this compact, or to effectuate in any other respect the purposes of this compact.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.